Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 5
SUPREME COURT REPORTER

Section.

§ 1-501. Clerk to be ex officio reporter.

The clerk of the Supreme Court shall be ex officio reporter of the decisions of the Supreme Court.

§ 1-502. Decisions to be reported.

The reporter must prepare a report of all decisions of such court.

§ 1-503. Preparation of decisions.

The decisions shall be prepared for publication by giving the title to each case, a syllabus of the points decided, and the names of the counsel appearing in the Supreme Court in the case, and each volume shall contain, at the end thereof, a full and comprehensive index alphabetically arranged, and there shall be prefixed thereto a table of cases decided, and a table of statutes and constitutional provisions construed.

§ 1-504. Name and arrangement of reports. — Volumes published under the provisions of this article shall be called “Idaho Reports, Volume

.” Volumes shall be numbered consecutively. Each volume shall commence with the decisions immediately following those reported in the preceding volume. All decisions shall be reported in the order in which they were handed down, chronologically. All volumes shall be uniform in size and amount of matter contained, with volume 1, Idaho Reports, new series, and the style of type the same and composition shall be similar, and the paper and binding and all material and work, including sewing, shall be equally as good, and similar to that used in said volume 1, Idaho Reports, new series. Each volume of said reports when printed shall contain not less than eight hundred (800) pages, exclusive of the index thereto.

§ 1-505. Distribution of reports.

The reporter shall have no pecuniary interest in the reports. The decisions of the said supreme court shall be prepared for publication, by the reporter, as rapidly as possible, and as soon as a sufficient number of decisions are prepared to fill a volume, such a volume shall be printed, and as many copies thereof as directed by the administrative director of the courts, shall be delivered to the state law librarian, who shall distribute them as follows: to the librarian of congress, three (3) copies; to the Idaho state law library, five (5) copies; to the university of Idaho, general library, two (2) copies; to the Idaho state university library, one (1) copy; to Boise state university library, one (1) copy; to the college of law of the university of Idaho, twelve (12) copies; to the Lewis-Clark state college, one (1) copy; to the library at the state penitentiary, one (1) copy; to each county prosecuting attorney, one (1) copy; to each magistrate, one (1) copy; to each district judge, one (1) copy; to each justice of the supreme court, one (1) copy; to the clerk of the supreme court, one (1) copy; to the attorney general, five (5) copies; one (1) copy to the department of lands of Idaho; one (1) copy to the public utilities commission of Idaho; one (1) copy to the industrial commission; one (1) copy to the division of public works; one (1) copy to the department of insurance; one (1) copy to the judiciary committee of the senate during sessions of the legislature; one (1) copy to the judiciary committee of the house of representatives during sessions of the legislature; to each state and territory in the United States sending to this state copies of its printed court reports, one (1) copy for the use of the state library or law library thereof; to each foreign state or country, sending to this state copies of its printed court reports, one (1) copy; to the governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state controller, superintendent of public instruction, each one (1) copy; and to other officers and institutions as directed by the administrative director of the courts; provided, that each public officer receiving a copy of any volume or volumes of said reports under the provisions of this section, shall take good care of the same, and shall upon retiring from office, turn the same over to his successor in office, provided further, that copies of any volume of such reports may be again issued to any of said officers, institutions, states or territories upon good and sufficient proof of loss of the copies sought to be replaced, presented to the administrative director of the courts, who may direct the librarian to furnish another copy of the volume so lost, in place thereof. Any of the said officers, institutions, states or territories may inform the administrative director that they do not wish to receive these volumes or wish to receive a lesser number of volumes than specified in this section. The state law librarian shall then cease distributing volumes to those recipients who no longer wish to receive them, and shall distribute the number of volumes requested to those recipients who wish to receive a lesser number of volumes than specified in this section. Recipients may also inform the administrative director that they wish to resume receiving the volumes, or wish to resume receiving the full number of volumes specified in this section, and the state law librarian shall then distribute to those recipients the volumes published thereafter in the number specified in this section.

§ 1-506. Contract to print reports.

The contract to print the reports of such decisions shall be let by the reporter with the approval of the justices of the supreme court, or a majority thereof, to some person or persons who will print the same on terms most advantageous to the state, and who will furnish the state with a maximum of four hundred (400) copies of each volume, the exact number of copies to be determined by the supreme court, at a cost to be fixed in such contract per volume and who will agree to furnish copies of the reports to the public at a price not exceeding the cost per volume at which the same is to be furnished to the state: provided, the work shall be done in the state of Idaho, if responsible parties therein offer to do said work on terms as favorable to the state as any outside bidder.

§ 1-507. Bond of printer. [Repealed.]

§ 1-508. Receipt to printer — Record and receipt for reports distributed.

The librarian of the state law library shall give to the contracting printer a receipt for all copies of reports of said decisions delivered to him by such printer, and the librarian shall keep a correct record, in a book kept especially for that purpose, of all volumes received and distributed under the provisions of this chapter, and shall take a receipt for all copies of such reports distributed, and file and preserve the same.